West Virginia, session 2026, SB342.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of West Virginia: ARTICLE 9. Authorization for miscellaneous boards and agencies to promulgate legislative rules. §64-9-1. Board of Landscape Architects. The legislative rule filed in the State Register on July 25, 2025, authorized under the authority of §30-1-23 of this code, relating to the Board of Landscape Architects (application for waiver of initial licensing fees for certain individuals, 9 CSR 04), is authorized.